test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_22oi_sivakka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: linn../bin/olo-gen.hfstol
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: linn../bin/iolo.fst
    Morph: linn../bin/olo.fst
    App: linnlookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sivakka: # Noun 'borg' - n_22oi ei tsekattu
     sivakka+N+Sg+Nom: sivakka
     sivakka+N+Sg+Gen: sivakan
     sivakka+N+Sg+Par: sivakkaa
     sivakka+N+Sg+Tra: sivakaksi
     sivakka+N+Sg+Abe: sivakatta
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ine: sivakassa
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ela: sivakasta
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ill: sivakkhaan
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ade: sivakalla
     sivakka+N+Sg+Abl: sivakalta
     sivakka+N+Sg+All: sivakalle
     sivakka+N+Sg+Ess: sivakkanna
     sivakka+N+Pl+Nom: sivakat
     sivakka+N+Pl+Gen: sivakoitten
     sivakka+N+Pl+Par: sivakoita
     sivakka+N+Pl+Tra: sivakoiksi
     sivakka+N+Pl+Abe: sivakoitta
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ine: sivakoissa
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ela: sivakoista
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ill: sivakkhoin
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ade: sivakoila
     sivakka+N+Pl+Abl: sivakoilta
     sivakka+N+Pl+All: sivakoile
     sivakka+N+Pl+Ess: sivakkoina
     sivakka+N+Pl+Com: sivakkoine
